Washington statutes.
RCW 18.22.083

License—Examination to determine professional qualifications.

Before being issued a license to practice podiatric medicine and surgery, applicants must successfully pass the examinations administered by the national board of podiatry examiners and an examination administered or approved by the board to determine their professional qualifications. The examination administered by the board shall include the subject areas as the board may require by rule.

The board may approve an examination prepared or administered, or both, by a private testing agency, other licensing authority, or association of licensing authorities.

The board may by rule establish the passing grade for the examination.

[ 1990 c 147 s 11; 1982 c 21 s 13.]